Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1923.03
Municipality; submit codes, permits, ordinances, zoning, and regulations for review.

Each municipality shall submit to the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature all fire and building safety codes, fire and building safety permits, and health department and sanitation ordinances, zoning, and regulations relating to child care facilities for review once every five years.

Laws 2024, LB874, § 9.